Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.314

Eastern College fund—Other revenue for support of Eastern Washington University.

No revenue from any source other than the general fund, which, except for the provisions hereof, would have been paid into the Eastern College fund, shall be used for any purpose except the support of the Eastern Washington University (formerly Eastern Washington State College).

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 107; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.314. Prior: 1955 c 334 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.